Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
CHAPTER 1 General Provisions

49-1-1.
Definitions.

As used in this title, the term:

“Board” means the Board of Human Services.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of human services.

“County board” means a county or district board of family and children services.

“County department” means a county or district department of family and children services.

“County director” means the director of a county or district department of family and children services.

“Department” means the Department of Human Services.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 355, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 85, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 218, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, §§ 1201, 1203, 1204, 1215; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228.

49-1-2.
Compliance of county departments with rules and regulations of the Department of Human Services.

All rules and regulations made by the Department of Human Services shall be binding on the counties and shall be complied with by the respective county departments.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 311, § 4; Ga. L. 1937, p. 568, § 5; Ga. L. 1937, p. 630, § 4; Ga. L. 1952, p. 15, § 4; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Temporary assistance for needy families (TANF) programs, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Resources, Family and Children Services; Child Care Institutions, Chapter 290-2-28.

49-1-3.
[Reserved] Power of Governor to reorganize state and local health and welfare organizations; appointment of district health and welfare directors and staff.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 1211, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 685, §§ 1, 2; repealed by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228, effective July 1, 2009.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2009.

49-1-4.
Sales by administrators to institutions prohibited.

No individual, supervisor, or member of the Board of Human Services or the county or district boards of family and children services having to do with the administration of this title shall be authorized or permitted, directly or indirectly, to sell supplies or other items of any kind or character to any of the institutions to be benefited by this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 355, § 20A; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228.

49-1-5.
Suspension and removal of county board member, county director, or employee or official of department.

In order that the public welfare laws of this state may be better enforced, the Governor is authorized and empowered to suspend any member of any county board, any county director, or any employee or official of the department whenever he or she shall find that good cause for such suspension exists. Such suspension shall be by executive order of the Governor, which shall state the reason therefor. A copy of such order of suspension shall be sent to the person so suspended within five days after it is issued, by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested, together with a notice from the Governor or his or her executive secretary that the suspended person may be heard before the Governor at such time as may be stated in the notice, which hearing shall be not less than ten nor more than 20 days from the date of the notice. Upon such hearing, if the Governor shall find that good cause for the removal of the person so suspended exists, he or she is authorized and empowered to remove such member of any county board, any county director, or any employee or official in the department; whereupon, such person’s tenure of office or employment shall terminate, subject to the right of appeal granted to any employee by or under authority of Chapter 20 of Title 45, and the vacancy shall be filled as provided by law. If the Governor shall find that good cause for the removal of such person does not exist, he or she shall, by appropriate executive order, restore him or her to duty.

In addition to removal by the Governor as specified in subsection (a) of this Code section, the director of the Division of Family and Children Services may terminate the employment of any county director or district director subject to any right of appeal granted to such terminated director by or under the authority of Chapter 20 of Title 45, and the vacancy shall be filled as provided by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 485, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 240, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-93/HB 642.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “by or under authority of Chapter 20 of Title 45” for “under the State Personnel Administration by Chapter 20 of Title 45” in the next-to-last sentence of subsection (a); and substituted “granted to such terminated director by or under the authority of Chapter 20 of Title 45” for “such director may have under the State Personnel Administration by Chapter 20 of Title 45” near the middle of subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

49-1-6.
Transfer of assets of nonprofit corporation to department.

Any charitable or nonprofit corporation which has been granted a charter or articles of incorporation under the laws of this state may transfer all or a part of its assets to the department upon such terms as may be agreed upon between such corporation and the department, provided such corporation shall first have obtained authority to make such transfer in accordance with this Code section.

Any such corporation may apply for authority to make such transfer by filing its petition with the superior court of the county in which such corporation has its principal office. Such application shall set forth the assets which the corporation desires to transfer to the department and the terms upon which it desires to transfer these assets.

Such corporation, once a week for four weeks prior to the filing of such petition, shall publish notice in the newspaper of the county in which is located the principal office of the corporation, such newspaper being the newspaper in which notices of sheriff’s sales are advertised. The notice shall set forth the date, time, and place when such application will be presented, the court to which it will be presented, and the assets which such corporation desires to transfer to the department.

After a hearing, the court shall be authorized to grant the application and permit a transfer of the assets of the applicant upon terms as set out in the application or modified as the court may deem advisable, if the court considers this in the public interest; or the court may deny the application if the court deems such denial to be in the public interest. Where such corporation makes a transfer of all of its right, title, and interest in any of its assets to the department and such transfer is made pursuant to the authority of the court obtained in the manner provided for in this Code section, such transfer shall be conclusively deemed to be a proper and legal transfer.

Should such corporation desire to transfer all of its assets to the department, the court to which such application is presented may include in its order a provision that upon the transfer by such corporation of all of its assets to the department and upon compliance with Chapter 3 of Title 14, the charter or articles of incorporation of such corporation shall stand surrendered and the corporation dissolved.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall be considered as authorizing the department to accept a transfer of assets upon terms which would require the use of them by the department in a manner not authorized by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 97, §§ 1-6; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228.

49-1-7.
Home delivered meals, transportation, services for the elderly, and preschool children with special needs fund.

The General Assembly finds that it is in the best interest of the state to provide for programs for home delivered meals, transportation services for the elderly, and preschool children with special needs, including but not limited to disabled children, troubled children, school readiness programs, and other similar needs for the benefit of the citizens of Georgia. In addition to and as a supplement to traditional financing mechanisms for such programs, it is the policy of this state to enable and encourage citizens voluntarily to support such programs.

To support programs for home delivered meals, transportation services for the elderly, and preschool children with special needs which programs have been established or approved by the department or the Department of Community Health, the department may, without limitation, promote and solicit voluntary contributions through the income tax return contribution mechanism established in subsection (f) of this Code section, through offers to match contributions by any person with moneys appropriated or contributed to the department or the Department of Community Health for such programs, or through any fund raising or other promotional techniques deemed appropriate by the department or the Department of Community Health.

There is established a special fund to be known as the “Home Delivered Meals, Transportation Services for the Elderly, and Preschool Children with Special Needs Fund.” This fund shall consist of all moneys contributed under subsection (b) of this Code section, all moneys transferred to the department under subsection (f) of this Code section, and any other moneys contributed to this fund or to the home delivered meals, transportation services for the elderly, or preschool children with special needs programs of the department or the Department of Community Health and all interest thereon. All balances in the fund shall be deposited in an interest-bearing account identifying the fund and shall be carried forward each year so that no part thereof may be deposited in the general treasury. The fund shall be administered and the moneys held in the fund shall be expended by the department through the Division of Aging Services in furtherance of home delivered meals and transportation services to the elderly programs and by the Department of Community Health in furtherance of preschool children with special needs programs.

Following the transmittal of contributions to the department for deposit in the fund pursuant to subsection (f) of this Code section, the expenditure of moneys in the fund shall be allocated as follows:

Fifty percent of the contributions to the fund shall be used for home delivered meals and transportation services to the elderly programs; and

Fifty percent of the contributions to the fund shall be transferred to the Department of Community Health to be used for preschool children with special needs programs.

Contributions to the fund shall be deemed supplemental to and shall in no way supplant funding that would otherwise be appropriated for these purposes. Contributions shall only be used for benefits and services and shall not be used for personnel or administrative positions. The department and the Department of Community Health shall each prepare, by February 1 of each year, an accounting of the funds received and expended from the fund and a review and evaluation of all expended moneys of the fund. The reports shall be made available to the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, to the members of the Board of Human Services, and, upon request, to members of the public.

Unless an earlier date is deemed feasible and established by the Governor, each Georgia income tax return form for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1993, shall contain appropriate language, to be determined by the state revenue commissioner, offering the taxpayer the opportunity to contribute to the Home Delivered Meals, Transportation Services for the Elderly, and Preschool Children with Special Needs Fund established in subsection (c) of this Code section by either donating all or any part of any tax refund due, by authorizing a reduction in the refund check otherwise payable, or by contributing any amount over and above any amount of tax owed by adding that amount to the taxpayer’s payment. The instructions accompanying the income tax return form shall contain a description of the purposes for which this fund was established and the intended use of moneys received from the contributions. Each taxpayer required to file a state income tax return who desires to contribute to such fund may designate such contribution as provided in this Code section on the appropriate income tax return form.

The Department of Revenue shall determine annually the total amount so contributed, shall withhold therefrom a reasonable amount for administering this voluntary contribution program, and shall transmit the balance to the department for deposit in the fund established in subsection (c) of this Code section; provided, however, that the amount retained for administrative costs, including implementation costs, shall not exceed $50,000.00 per year. If, in any tax year, the administrative costs of the Department of Revenue for collecting contributions pursuant to this Code section exceed the sum of such contributions, the administrative costs which the Department of Revenue is authorized to withhold from such contributions shall not exceed the sum of such contributions.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-1-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 3241, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-1-7

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, a comma was inserted following “Resources (now Services)” in the last sentence of subsection (e).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, “that” was inserted following “however,” in the first sentence of paragraph (f)(2).

Administrative rules and regulations.

The Georgia Children and Elderly Fund, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Grants of the Children’s Trust Fund Commission, Grant Program, § 98-1-.02.

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section 49-1-7 (Ga. L. 1946, p. 45, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 85, § 3; Ga. L. 1963, p. 218, § 7), relating to the purchase of adjacent lands for institutions, was repealed by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1, effective July 1, 2009.

49-1-8.
Website access to link or portal to social services specific to kinship caregivers and children in their care; definitions.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Basic necessities” means water, electricity, gas, power, light, heat, telephone, or other public utility services.

“Child” means any person under 18 years of age.

“Kinship caregiver” means a grandparent, aunt, uncle, great aunt, great uncle, cousin, sibling, or close family friend of a child who has assumed responsibility for raising such child in an informal, noncustodial, or guardianship capacity upon the parents of such child losing or abdicating the ability to care for or provide basic necessities for such child.

“Parents” means the legal father and the legal mother of a child.

The department shall have the authority to provide and shall take all necessary steps to so provide a separate link or portal on its website which provides access to social services that are specific to kinship caregivers and the children in their care. Such link or portal shall provide specific information and access for applying for public assistance benefits in this state as a kinship caregiver and on behalf of children in the care of a kinship caregiver.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-1-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 337, § 1-1/HB 962.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2016.

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section 49-1-8, relating to sales of surplus products of institutions and disposition of proceeds, was repealed by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228, effective July 1, 2009. The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 1939, p. 392, §§ 1, 4.

49-1-9.
Redesignated.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-1/HB 228, effective July 1, 2009, redesignated former Code Section 49-1-9 as present Code Section 49-1-7.